Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202538-1512
License; examination; conditions; waiver.

(1) Any person may obtain a hearing instrument specialist license under the Hearing Instrument Specialists Practice Act by successfully passing a qualifying examination pursuant to section 38-1514 if the applicant provides verification to the department, on a form provided by the department, that such person:

(a) Is at least twenty-one years of age;

(b) Has an education equivalent to a four-year course in an accredited high school; and

(c)(i) Has completed the minimum number of practicum hours prescribed by the board;

(ii) Has a two-year degree in hearing instrument sciences or an equivalent as determined by the board;

(iii) Has held a current, unsuspended, and unrevoked license to dispense hearing instruments from another jurisdiction for at least twelve of the last eighteen months prior to taking the examination;

(iv) Is certified by the National Board for Certification in Hearing Instrument Sciences at the time of taking the examination; or

(v) Holds an advanced credential offered by the International Hearing Society at the time of taking the examination.

(2) The department, with the recommendation of the board, may determine whether a person who has completed a licensure program outside of the United States may take the examination.

(3) The department, upon recommendation of the board, may waive components of the examination pursuant to section 38-1514 for licensure as a hearing instrument specialist if the person has passed the same examination as provided in section 38-1514 or a substantially equivalent examination as determined by the board.

(4) The department, with the recommendation of the board, shall determine whether a person has met the requirements to be eligible to take the examination pursuant to the Hearing Instrument Specialists Practice Act.

Laws 1969, c. 767, § 7, p. 2907;

Laws 1986, LB 701, § 6;

Laws 1987, LB 473, § 53;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 153;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-4707;

Laws 2007, LB247, § 53;

Laws 2007, LB247, § 71;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 576;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 30;

Laws 2017, LB88, § 54;

Laws 2025, LB332, § 20.

Credentialing, general requirements and issuance procedures, see section 38-121 et seq.